Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-688
Prosecution; disposition thereof.

Prosecutions for violations declared by the Nebraska Rules of the Road to be misdemeanors or felonies shall be conducted and disposed of in the same manner as provided for such prosecutions under the laws of this state, and traffic infractions shall be treated in the same manner as misdemeanors, except as otherwise provided by law.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 111;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,111;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 184;

Laws 2000, LB 74, § 2.